Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 15
Voluntary Veterans' Preference Employment Policy

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-15-101. Title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Voluntary Veterans' Preference Employment Policy Act”.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 598, § 1.

11-15-102. Definitions.

As used in this section:

“DD 214” means a United States Department of Defense Report of Separation form or its predecessor or successor forms;

“Local government employer” means a municipality, a county, or township of the state that has issued a resolution to implement a veterans' preference employment policy under § 11-15-103.

“Local government employer” does not include the state or a public institution of higher education;

“Private employer” means a sole proprietor, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other entity with one (1) or more employees.

“Private employer” does not include the state or a public institution of higher education;

“Spouse of a disabled veteran” means:

The spouse of a veteran who has been classified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs' Veterans Benefits Administration as having a permanent total disability rating; and

A United States citizen;

“Surviving spouse” means a spouse of a deceased veteran who is:

Unmarried at the time he or she seeks a veterans' preference under § 11-15-103; and

A United States citizen;

“Veteran” means a person who:

Served on active duty for a period of more than one hundred eighty (180) days and was discharged or released from active duty with other than a dishonorable discharge;

Was discharged or released from active duty because of a service-connected disability; or

As a member of a reserve component under an order to active duty, not to include training, was discharged or released from duty with other than a dishonorable discharge; and

“Veterans' preference employment policy” means a private employer or local government employer's voluntary preference for hiring, promoting, or retaining a veteran, spouse of a disabled veteran, or surviving spouse of a veteran over another equally qualified applicant or employee.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 598, § 1.

11-15-103. Voluntary veterans' preference employment policy — Private employment — Local government employment.

A private employer or local government employer may have a voluntary veterans' preference employment policy.

The veterans' preference employment policy:

Shall be in writing;

Shall be applied uniformly to employment decisions regarding the hiring, promotion, or retention during a reduction in force; and

May be modeled after § 21-3-302(d)-(g) and § 21-3-303 et seq.

A veteran, spouse of a disabled veteran, or surviving spouse of a veteran shall submit a DD 214 of the veteran to a private employer or local government employer with a veterans' preference employment policy to be eligible for the preference.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 598, § 1.

11-15-104. Registry — Participating employers.

The Division of Workforce Services shall maintain a registry of private employers and local government employers in Arkansas that have a voluntary veterans' preference employment policy.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 598, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 328.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services”.

11-15-105. Verification of eligibility.

The Department of Veterans Affairs and the Division of Workforce Services shall assist a private employer or a local government employer in determining if an applicant or employee is a veteran, spouse of a disabled veteran, or surviving spouse of a veteran.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 598, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6328.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services”.